District of Columbia statutes.
15-370

Uniformity of interpretation.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 10 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.